Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-1620
Department; establish technical assistance program.

The department shall establish a training program to provide initial technical assistance to local code officials and residential and commercial builders upon adoption and implementation of a new Nebraska Energy Code. The program shall include the training of local code officials in building technology and local enforcement procedure related to implementation of the Nebraska Energy Code and the development of training programs suitable for presentation by local governments, educational institutions, and other public or private entities. Subsequent requests for training shall be fulfilled at a fee that pays for the department's costs for such training.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 44;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 165.
July 1, 2019